Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4626.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) Any property which, at the time this act takes effect, constitutes that, on May 10, 1948, constituted community property by virtue because of the provisions of Act No. 317 of the Public Acts of 1947 shall continue former 1947 PA 317 continues to be community property and remain remains subject to the provisions of said that act, and for such that purpose said that act shall continue continues in force. : Provided, That, except where However, unless the conveyance or other instrument of title under which the same property was acquired or other evidence of ownership thereof of the property expressly states the intention that such the property shall be is community property, any such the property shall, upon the expiration of 1 year after the time this act takes effect, must, after May 9, 1949, be deemed to be the separate property of 1 or both of the husband or the wife, or both, spouses, according to the name or names set forth in the conveyance or other instrument of title under which such the property was acquired or other evidence of ownership thereof, of the property, unless, within such 1 year period, after May 9, 1948 and before May 10, 1949, either spouse having an interest therein, in the property, or any of the devisees, legatees, heirs, or distributees of either of them who shall have has died prior to or during the running of such 1 year period, shall file before May 10, 1949, files notice of claim that such the property constitutes community property. (2) Such A notice of claim under this section, to be effective, shall must be in writing, shall contain a description of each item of property to which the same notice relates, shall be executed by the party making the same claim in the manner required for the execution of deeds, and shall be filed in the office of the register of deeds for the county in which the spouse by whom, or in whose behalf, the same claim is made resides at the time of the filing thereof, or, in the event that such if the spouse shall have has died, for the county in which such the spouse resided at the time of death. In the event that such If the notice of claim relates to real property located in any other county or counties, to be effective as to such that property, a duplicate original of such the notice of claim shall must also be filed in the office of the register of deeds for each such other county. (3) No A disability of any kind or lack of knowledge on the part of anyone shall does not suspend the running of the time for filing such a notice of claim under this section, but such the notice may be executed and filed by any other person acting in behalf of any party by whom such the notice of claim may be filed who is under a disability or otherwise unable to make such the claim in his or her own behalf. Sec. 4. Any property hereafter derived after May 10, 1948 from property which that constitutes community property by virtue of the provisions of Act No. 317 of the Public Acts of 1947 shall constitute former 1947 PA 317 constitutes community property and remain remains subject to the provisions of said that act and for such that purpose said that act shall continue continues in force. : Provided, That, except where However, unless the conveyance or other instrument of title under which the same property is acquired or other evidence of ownership thereof of the property expressly states the intention that such the property shall be is community property, any such property acquired within 1 year after the time this act takes effect shall before May 10, 1949 must be deemed to be separate property of 1 or both of the husband or the wife, or both, spouses according to the name or names set forth in the conveyance or other instrument of title under which such the property is acquired or other evidence of ownership thereof, of the property, unless within such 1 year period after May 9, 1948 and before May 10, 1949, either spouse having an interest therein, in the property or any of the devisees, legatees, heirs, or distributees of either of them who shall have has died prior to or during the running of such 1 year period, shall file before May 10, 1949 files notice of claim that such the property constitutes community property. : And provided further, That any Any such property acquired after the expiration of such 1 year period shall May 9, 1949 must be deemed to be separate property, as aforesaid, provided in this section, unless the conveyance or other instrument of title under which such the property is acquired or other evidence of ownership thereof shall of the property expressly state states the intention that such the property shall constitute constitutes community property. All of the The provisions of section 3 of this act with respect to any about a notice of claim pursuant thereto shall be applicable with respect under section 3 apply to any a notice of claim under the provisions of this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.